testing/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованкседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованкседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксентькак
